Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Subtitle 6. Shares and Distributions

271B.6-010.
Authorized shares.

The articles of incorporation shall prescribe the classes of shares and series of shares within a class and the number of shares of each class and series that the corporation is authorized to issue. If more than one (1) class or series of shares is authorized, the articles of incorporation shall prescribe a distinguishing designation for each class or series, and, prior to the issuance of shares of a class or series, the preferences, limitations, and relative rights of that class or series must be described in the articles of incorporation. All shares of a class shall have preferences, limitations, and relative rights identical with those of other shares of the same class except to the extent otherwise permitted by KRS

271B.6-020

.

The articles of incorporation shall authorize:

One (1) or more classes or series of shares that together have unlimited voting rights; and

One (1) or more classes or series of shares which may be the same class or classes as those with voting rights, that together are entitled to receive the net assets of the corporation upon dissolution.

The articles of incorporation may authorize one (1) or more classes or series of shares that:

Have special, conditional, or limited voting rights, or no right to vote, except to the extent otherwise provided by this chapter;

Are redeemable or convertible as specified in the articles of incorporation:

At the option of the corporation, the shareholder, or another person or upon the occurrence of a designated event;

For cash, indebtedness, securities, or other property; or

In a designated amount or in an amount determined in accordance with a designated formula or by reference to extrinsic data or events;

Entitle the holders to distributions calculated in any manner, including dividends that may be cumulative, noncumulative, or partially cumulative; or

Have preference over any other class or series of shares with respect to distributions, including dividends and distributions upon the dissolution of the corporation.

Terms of shares may be made dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the articles of incorporation in accordance with KRS

271B.1-200

(2).

The description of the designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights of share classes in subsection (3) of this section shall not be considered exhaustive.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
33, effective January 1, 1989; Acts 2007, ch. 137, § 60, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
60, effective July 15, 2010; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, §
121, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

271B.6-020.
Terms of class or series determined by board of directors — Articles of amendment.

If the articles of incorporation so provide, the board of directors may determine, in whole or in part, the preferences, limitations, and relative rights, within the limits set forth in KRS

271B.6-010

, of:

Any class of shares before the issuance of any shares of that class; or

One (1) or more series within a class before the issuance of any shares of that series.

Each series of a class shall be given a distinguishing designation.

All shares of a series shall have preferences, limitations, and relative rights identical with those of other shares of the same series and, except to the extent otherwise provided in the description of the series, with those of other series of the same class.

Before issuing any shares of a class or series created under this section, the corporation shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of amendment, which are effective without shareholder action, that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of the amendment determining the terms of the class or series of shares;

The date it was adopted; and

A statement that the amendment was duly adopted by the board of directors.

The board of directors may adopt articles of amendment without shareholder action to make any of the following changes to a class or series created under this section:

Increase the number of shares of a series but not above the total number of authorized and unissued shares of the class;

Decrease the number of shares of a series but not below the number of shares of the series then issued and outstanding;

Amend the designation, preferences, limitations, or relative rights of the shares of a class or series if no shares of the class or series are then issued or outstanding; or

Eliminate the designation of, and all references to, a series from the articles of incorporation if no shares of the series are then issued and outstanding.

If an amendment reduces the number of shares of a series, or eliminates a series, the shares previously subject to issuance in the series shall return to the status they had before the creation of the series.

Articles of amendment adopted pursuant to subsection (5) of this section shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing and shall state:

The name of the corporation;

The designation of the class or series subject to the amendment;

The text of the amendment changing the class or series;

The date the amendment was adopted; and

A statement that the amendment was duly adopted by the board of directors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 34, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, § 8, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

271B.6-030.
Issued and outstanding shares.

A corporation may issue the number of shares of each class or series authorized by the articles of incorporation. Shares that are issued shall be outstanding shares until they are reacquired, redeemed, converted, or canceled.

The reacquisition, redemption, or conversion of outstanding shares shall be subject to the limitations of subsection (3) of this section and to KRS

271B.6-400

.

At all times that shares of the corporation are outstanding, one (1) or more shares that together have unlimited voting rights and one (1) or more shares that together are entitled to receive the net assets of the corporation upon dissolution shall be outstanding.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 35, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.6-040.
Fractional shares.

A corporation may:

Issue fractions of a share or pay in money the value of fractions of a share;

Arrange for disposition of fractional shares by the shareholders; and

Issue scrip in registered or bearer form entitling the holder to receive a full share upon surrendering enough scrip to equal a full share.

Each certificate representing scrip shall be conspicuously labeled “scrip” and shall contain the information required by subsection (2) of KRS

271B.6-250

.

The holder of a fractional share shall be entitled to exercise the rights of a shareholder, including the right to vote, to receive dividends, and to participate in the assets of the corporation upon liquidation. The holder of scrip shall not be entitled to any of these rights unless the scrip provides for them.

The board of directors may authorize the issuance of scrip subject to any condition considered desirable, including:

That the scrip will become void if not exchanged for full shares before a specified date; and

That the shares for which the scrip is exchangeable may be sold and the proceeds paid to the scripholders.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 36, effective January 1, 1989.